src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON MUOTTII !!≈ **@CODE@** almost like KARRII, direct to it?
+A+Attr:is K ; ! muottiis
+A: X_KARRII ;
+A:^SV CCOMPe ;
+A:i%> CMUS ;
+A+Cmp/Attr:is ATTR_R ; 

!+A+Sg+Nom: K ;  ! muottii
!+A+Sg+Gen: K ;  ! muottii
!+A+Sg+Acc: K ;  ! muottii
!+A+Sg+Ill:%>jân K ;  ! muottiijân
!+A+Sg+Loc:%>st K ;  ! muottiist
!+A+Sg+Com:^SVSH%>jn K ;  ! muottijn
!+A+Sg+Abe:%>ttáá K ;  ! muottiittáá
!+A+Ess:%>jin K ;  ! muottiijin
!+Al+Pl+Nom:%>h K ;  ! muottiih
!+A+Pl+Gen:^SVSH%>j K ;  ! muottij
!+A+Pl+Acc:^SVSH%>jd K ;  ! muottijd
!+A+Pl+Ill:^SVSH%>jd K ;  ! muottijd
!+A+Pl+Loc:^SVSH%>jn K ;  ! muottijn
!+A+Pl+Com:%> GUIN ;  ! muottiiguin
!+A+Pl+Abe:%>ttáá K ;  ! muottiittáá

LEXICON A_VUALAAS !!≈ **@CODE@** 
+A+Attr:^SV^RLEN^SLEN%>š K ;
+A+Sg+Nom:^SV^RLEN^SLEN%>š K ; 	  ! kamevuálááš
+A+Sg+Gen:^SV^RLEN^SLEN K ; 	  ! kamevuáláá
+A+Sg+Acc:^SV^RLEN^SLEN K ;	  ! kamevuáláá
+A+Sg+Ill:%>žân K ;		  ! kamevuálážân
+A+Sg+Loc:^SV^RLEN^SLEN%>st K ;	  ! kamevuáláást
+A+Sg+Com:%>in K ; 		  ! kamevuáláin
+A+Sg+Abe:^SV^RLEN^SLEN%>ttáá K ; ! vuálááttáá
+A+Ess:%>žin K ;		
+A+Par:%>žid K ; 		
+A+Pl+Nom:^SV^RLEN^SLEN%>h K ; 	
+A+Pl+Gen:^SV^RLEN^SLEN%>id K ; 	! 
+A+Pl+Ill:^SV^RLEN^SLEN%>id K ;   ! cissáid
+A+Pl+Loc:%>in K ; 		  ! cissáin
+A+Pl+Com:%>i GUIN ; 		  ! cissáiguin
+A+Pl+Abe:%>ittáá K ; 		  ! cissáittáá
+A+Cmp/Attr:^SV^RLEN^SLEN%>š ATTR_R ; !


LEXICON SIAMMAS !!≈ **@CODE@** 
+A+Sg+Nom:š K ; 				! siämmáš
+A+Sg+Gen:^SV^SLEN K ; 				! siämmáá
+A+Sg+Acc:^SV^SLEN K ;				! siämmáá
+A+Sg+Ill:%>žân K ;				! siämmážân
+A+Sg+Loc:%>st K ;				! siämmást
+A+Sg+Com:%>in K ; 				! siämmáin
+A+Sg+Abe:^SV^SLEN%>ttáá K ; 			! siämmááttáá
+A+Ess:%>žin K ;				! siämmážin
+A+Par:%>žid K ; 				! siämmážid
+A+Pl+Nom:^SV^SLEN%>h K ;			! siämmááh
+A+Pl+Gen:%>i K ; 				! siämmái
+A+Pl+Acc:%>id K ; 				! siämmáid
+A+Pl+Ill:%>id K ; 				! siämmáid
+A+Pl+Loc:%>in K ; 				! siämmáin
+A+Pl+Com:%>i GUIN ; 				! siämmáiguin
+A+Pl+Abe:%>ittáá K ; 				! siämmáittáá


LEXICON JIAVTAS !!≈ **@CODE@** 
!+A+Attr:áš^WG  K ; !jiävtâš; attr in a partial conguence; attr should not be given?
+A+Sg+Nom:áš^WG^RLEN K ; 	! jiävtáš
+A+Sg+Gen:áá K ; 		! jiävttáá
+A+Sg+Acc:áá K ;		! jiävttáá
+A+Sg+Ill:á^WG^RLEN%>žân K ;	! jiävtážân
+A+Sg+Loc:áá%>st K ;		! jiävttáást
+A+Sg+Com:á%>in K ; 		! jiävttáin
+A+Sg+Abe:áá%>ttáá K ; 		! jiävttááttáá
+A+Ess:á^WG%>žin K ;		! jiävtážin
+A+Par:á^WG%>žid K ; 		! jiävtážid
+A+Pl+Nom:áá%>h K ; 		! jiävttááh
+A+Pl+Gen:á%>i K ; 		! jiävttái
+A+Pl+Acc:á%>id K ; 		! jiävttáid
+A+Pl+Ill:á%>id K ; 		! jiävttáid
+A+Pl+Loc:á%>in K ; 		! jiävttáin
+A+Pl+Com:á%>i GUIN ; 		! jiävttáiguin
+A+Pl+Abe:á%>ittáá K ; 		! jiävttáittáá

!+A+Cmp/Attr:áš^WG%> ATTR_R ;


LEXICON TAASSAS !!≈ **@CODE@** note táássáš itself is not here.
+A+Attr:áš  K ; 				!táássáš; attr in a partial congruens
+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:âš  K ; 		!táássâš ! from corpus Err/Orth?
+A+Sg+Nom:áš  K ; 				!táássáš
+A+Sg+Gen:áá^RVSH K ; 			! tássáá
+A+Sg+Acc:áá^RVSH K ;			! tássáá
+A+Sg+Ill:á^CSH%>žân K ;		! táásážân
+A+Sg+Loc:áá^RVSH%>st K ;		! tássáást
+A+Sg+Com:á^RVSH%>in K ; 		! tássáin
+A+Sg+Abe:áá^RVSH%>ttáá K ; 	! tássááttáá
+A+Ess:á^CSH%>žin K ;			! táásážin
+A+Par:á^CSH%>žid K ; 			! táásážid
+A+Pl+Nom:áá^RVSH%>h K ; 		! tássááh
+A+Pl+Gen:á^RVSH%>i K ; 		! tássái
+A+Pl+Acc:á^RVSH%>id K ; 		! tássáid
+A+Pl+Ill:á^RVSH%>id K ; 		! tássáid
+A+Pl+Loc:á^RVSH%>in K ; 		! tássáin
+A+Pl+Com:á^RVSH%>i GUIN ; 	! tássáiguin
+A+Pl+Abe:á^RVSH%>ittáá K ; 			! tássáittáá
!+A:%>á AS_SUF ;
+A+Cmp/Attr:áš ATTR_R ; !kuávdášmuseo


!! ## 4 syll stems
! ----------------

LEXICON A_KUNAGAS !!≈ **@CODE@** directing to  X_KUNAGAS; syeligâs, is like kunâgâs but FCD is not enough to create the comparation
+A+Attr:âs  K ;
+A:âss X_KUNAGAS	  ; 
+A+Cmp/Attr:âs ATTR_R ;
+A+Der1+Der/Comp+A:%>u oCOMP-SUF ; !MLO: syeligub, syeliguboh; oCOMP-SUF should work but I did now succeed
+A:%>u MOS ; ! syeligumos, syeligumoseh
+A: A_ADV ; !
+A:âš%> A_VUOTA ;

!+A+Sg+Nom:âs  K ; 				!syeligâs
!+A+Sg+Gen:âs K ; 				! syeligâs
!+A+Sg+Acc:âs K ;				! syeligâs
!+A+Sg+Ill:âsân K ;				! syeligâsân
!+A+Sg+Loc:âsâst K ;				! syeligâsâst
!+A+Sg+Com:âssáin K ; 			! syeligâssáin
!+A+Sg+Abe:âsttáá K ; 			! syeligâsttáá
!+A+Ess:âssân K ;				! syeligâssân
!+A+Par:âssâd K ; 				! syeligâssâd
!+A+Pl+Nom:âsah K ; 				! syeligâsah
!+A+Pl+Gen:âsâi K ; 				! syeligâsâi
!+A+Pl+Acc:âsâid K ; 			! syeligâsâid
!+A+Pl+Ill:âssáid K ; 			! syeligâssáid
!+A+Pl+Loc:âsâin K ; 			! syeligâsâin
!+A+Pl+Com:âsâi GUIN ; 			! syeligâsâiguin
!+A+Pl+Abe:âsâittáá K ; 			! syeligâsâittáá

!+A+Der1+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom:%>ub K ; ! oCOMP-SUF for these?
!+A+Der1+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Gen:%>ub K ;
!+A+Der1+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Acc:%>ub K ;
!+A+Der1+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Ill:%>ubon K ;
!+A+Der1+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Loc:%>bboost K ;
!+A+Der1+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Com:%>bboin K ;
!+A+Der1+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Abe:%>ubttáá K ;
!+A+Der1+Der/Comp+A+Ess:%>bbon K ;
!+A+Der1+Der/Comp+A+Par:%>bbod K ;
!+A+Der1+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Nom:%>uboh K ;
!+A+Der1+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Gen:%>uboi K ;
!+A+Der1+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc:%>ubboid K ;
!+A+Der1+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Ill:%>ubboid K ;
!+A+Der1+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Loc:%>uboin K ;
!+A+Der1+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Com:%>uboi GUIN ;
!+A+Der1+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Com+Err/Orth:%>uboi GUIN ;
!+A+Der1+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Abe:%>iboittáá K ;



LEXICON UANIHASJ !!≈ **@CODE@** directing to LAS_SUF, attr, -âš
+A+Attr:is K ;
+A+Cmp/Attr:is ATTR_R ;
UANIHASJ_INFL ;

LEXICON KIERDAVAS !!≈ **@CODE@** 
+A+Attr:âš K ;
UANIHASJ_INFL ;


LEXICON UANIHASJ_INFL !!≈ **@CODE@** 
+A+Sg+Nom:âš K ;
+A: LAS_SUF ;
+A:%>u COMPo ;
+A:%>u MOS ;
+A: A_ADV ;
+A:âš%> A_VUOTA ;


LEXICON UNOHAS !!≈ **@CODE@** directing to LAS_SUF, attr, -is
+A+Sg+Nom:âs K ;
+A+Attr:âs K ;
+A+Attr+Err/Orth:is K ;
+A:âss X_KUNAGAS ;
+A:u COMPo ;
+A:u MOS ;
+A+Cmp/Attr:âs ATTR_R ;


LEXICON ANOLASJ !!≈ **@CODE@** directing to LAS_COMMON, attr, -âš
!! Adj - pooliitlâš: # attr. pooliitlâš; puolikongruenssi mahdollinen (#-paikat), puolikongr. asemesta SgNom.
+A+Attr:âš K ;
+A: X_LAS_COMMON_SG ; 
+A: X_LAS_COMMON_PL ; 
+A:u COMPo ;
+A:u MOS ; ! tehálumos
+A+Cmp/Attr:âš ATTR_R ;
+A+Cmp/SgNom:âš R ;
+A: A_ADV ; !máhđulávt
+A:âš%> A_VUOTA ;

LEXICON LAGAN !!≈ **@CODE@** directing to A_LITTER, attr. -lágán
+A+Attr:lágán K ;
+A+Attr+Use/NG:láván K ;
+A:lágán X_LITTER ;
+A+Use/NG:láván X_LITTER ;
!+A:%>u MOS ; ! jiešlágánumosáid
+A+Cmp/Attr:lágán ATTR_R ;
+A:lágán%> A_VUOTA ;



!LEXICON RAPPADAS
!UANIHASJ ; ! if it works: substitute  RAPPADAS with UANIHASJ in lexicon
!+A+Attr:is K ;
!+A:á X_RASTAGAS ;
!+A+Cmp/Attr:is ATTR_R ;

!+A+Sg+Nom:â%>š K ; ! rappâdâš
!+A+Sg+Gen:%>áá K ; 			! rappâdáá
!+A+Sg+Acc:%>áá K ; 			! rappâdáá
!+A+Sg+Ill:â%>žân K ;	! rappâdâžân
!+A+Sg+Loc:áá%>st K ;			! rappâdáást
!+A+Sg+Com:á%>in K ; 			! rappâdáin
!+A+Sg+Abe:áá%>ttáá K ; 		! rappâdááttáá
!+A+Ess:â%>žžân K ;	! rappâdâžžân
!+A+Par:â%>žžâd K ; ! rappâdâžžâd
!+A+Pl+Nom:áá%>h K ; 			! rappâdááh
!+A+Pl+Gen:á%>i K ; 			! rappâdái
!+A+Pl+Acc:á%>id K ; 			! rappâdáid
!+A+Pl+Ill:á%>id K ; 			! rappâdáid
!+A+Pl+Loc:á%>in K ; 			! rappâdáin
!+A+Pl+Com:á%>i GUIN ; 		! rappâdáiguin
!+A+Pl+Abe:á%>ittáá K ; 		! rappâdáittáá



LEXICON MUSTOTTEM !!≈ **@CODE@** pls note e > iä in sg ill; no comparation
+A+Attr:es K;
+A+Attr+Use/NG:is K;
+A+Attr+Use/NG:emes K;
+A:emeb COMPe ;
+A+Cmp/Attr+Use/NG:emes ATTR_R ;
+A+Cmp/Attr+Use/NG:is ATTR_R ;
+A+Cmp/Attr:es ATTR_R ;
+A+Sg+Nom:em K ;
+A+Sg+Gen:eme K ;
+A+Sg+Acc:eme K ;
+A+Sg+Ill:iämán K ;
+A+Sg+Loc:eemeest K ;
+A+Sg+Com:emáin K ;
+A+Sg+Abe:emttáá K ;
+A+Ess+Err/Orth:eemmin K ;
+A+Ess:emmin K ;
+A:em X_eh_PL ;
+A+Der4+Der/AAdv+Adv:eht K ;

LEXICON A_INDECL !!≈ **@CODE@** not all forms., attr = Sg. Nom.
+A+Attr: K ;    ! kulhijdum
+A+Sg+Nom: K ;  ! kulhijdum
+A+Cmp/Attr:  ATTR_R ;
+A: A_LASJ ; !


LEXICON OLMOOSMETTUM !!≈ **@CODE@**, not all forms. attr. = Sg. Nom.
+Use/NG:máttum METTUMforms ;
:mettum METTUMforms ;
